Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3804
Commission; functions.

The functions of the commission are to:

(1) Promote state and federal legislation beneficial to the Asian American community in Nebraska;

(2) Coordinate programs relating to the Asian American community in Nebraska regarding housing, education, welfare, medical and dental care, employment, economic development, law and order, and related problems;

(3) Work with other state and federal government agencies and federal and state elected officials in the development of programs in the areas described in subdivision (2) of this section;

(4) Keep the Governor's office apprised of the status of affairs in the Asian American community in Nebraska;

(5) Administer sections 81-3801 to 81-3807;

(6) Provide the public with information and education relevant to Asian American affairs in Nebraska; and

(7) Develop programs to encourage the total involvement of Asian American people in activities for the common benefit of the Asian American community.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 31.
July 19, 2024